Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.440

Dissolution—Disposition of property.

If the district at the time of dissolution was wholly within unincorporated territory in one county, its property vests in that county.

If the district at the time of dissolution was situated wholly within the boundaries of a single city, its property vests in that city.

If the district at the time of dissolution comprised only unincorporated territory in two or more counties, its property vests in those counties in proportion to the assessed value of each county's property within the boundaries of the district as shown on the last equalized county assessment roll.

If the district at the time of dissolution comprised both incorporated and unincorporated territory, its property vests in each unit in proportion as its assessed property value lies within the boundaries of the district: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That any real property, easements, or rights-of-way vest in the city in which they are situated or in the county in which they are situated.

[ 1957 c 153 s 44.]